Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB178.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 6 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "fiscal note" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky state
fiscal note statement, which estimates the effect on expenditures and revenues of
state government in implementing or complying with any proposed act of the
General Assembly filed during a regular or special session.
(2) A fiscal note shall be filed with the clerk in the chamber of the General Assembly
in which the bill or resolution was introduced and attached to each copy of the
bill or resolution. No bill or resolution shall be voted on by either chamber of the
General Assembly unless a fiscal note has been prepared and attached to the bill
or resolution.
(3) The director of the Legislative Research Commission shall:
(a) Create a standardized form and instructions for use in preparing fiscal
notes;
(b) Have the fiscal notes prepared by the Legislative Research Commission;
and
(c) Make the fiscal notes available to the public.
(4) A fiscal note shall contain the following information:
(a) Identifying information for the bill or resolution, including its number, title,
and sponsor;
(b) A brief summary of the bill or resolution;
(c) 1. A statement of whether the bill or resolution creates a fiscal impact;
and
2. If a fiscal impact is created:
a. An estimate of the expenditures and revenues that are impacted
Page 1 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1080
beginning with the initial year that a fiscal impact exists; and
b. i. An explanation of the bill or resolution's fiscal impact; or
ii. The reason for the omission of the fiscal impact, if one
cannot be estimated;
(d) A reference to the sources used for the data and information included in the
fiscal note; and
(e) The date the fiscal note was finalized.
Section 2. KRS 6.950 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 6.955 to 6.975, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Local government mandate statement[Fiscal note]" means a realistic statement of
the estimated effect on expenditures or revenue of local government in
implementing or complying with any proposed act of the General Assembly
whether filed in regular session or prefiled during the interim, order, or
administrative law;[.]
(2) "Local government" means cities, counties or urban-county governments; and[.]
(3) "State mandate" means any state constitutional, legislative, or executive law or
order which requires any local government to establish, expand, or modify its
activities, programs, or structure in[ such] a way that affects[as to affect]
expenditures from local revenues.
Section 3. KRS 6.955 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No bill or resolution which relates to any aspect of local government or any service
provided thereby shall be voted on by either chamber of the General Assembly
unless a local government mandate statement[fiscal note] has been prepared and
attached to the bill pursuant to KRS 6.960, except that, if in the chamber in which
the bill is being considered, two-thirds (2/3) of the members elected vote to waive
the local government mandate statement[fiscal note] requirement, no
statement[note] shall be required. The local government mandate statement[fiscal
Page 2 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1080
note] waiver shall be certified by the clerk of the chamber in which the bill is being
considered, and the[such] certification shall be attached to the bill. Although
waived in one (1) chamber, a local government mandate statement[fiscal note]
shall be required when the bill goes to the other chamber unless a majority of the
members elected to the[such] chamber vote to waive the local government
mandate statement[fiscal note] requirement.
(2) An executive order which relates to any aspect of local government or any service
provided thereby shall not be issued unless a local government mandate
statement[fiscal note] has been prepared and made a part of the order pursuant to
KRS 6.960.
Section 4. KRS 6.960 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The director of the Legislative Research Commission shall have the local
government mandate statement[fiscal note] prepared by the Legislative Research
Commission or by other departments or agencies of state government for any bill
introduced before the General Assembly which relates to any aspect of local
government or any service provided thereby. Departments or agencies of state
government so requested by the director shall comply with the request within seven
(7) working days of receipt. The local government mandate statement[fiscal note]
shall be filed with the clerk in the chamber of the General Assembly in which the
bill was introduced and attached to each copy of the bill.
(2) The secretary of finance shall have the local government mandate statement[fiscal
note] prepared by the Finance and Administration Cabinet or by other departments
or agencies of state government for any order promulgated by an executive
department or agency which relates to any aspect of local government or any
service provided thereby. The director of the Legislative Research Commission
shall determine the form of the statements[such notes]. The secretary may request
the advice or assistance of the Legislative Research Commission in the preparation
Page 3 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1080
of the local government mandate statement[fiscal note]. The local government
mandate statement[fiscal note] shall be attached to each copy of the order.
Section 5. KRS 6.965 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A local government mandate statement[fiscal note] shall state whether the bill or
order is determined to be a state mandate. This[Such] determination shall be made
by the director of the Legislative Research Commission except as provided by
subsection (2) of this section. If the bill or order is a state mandate, the local
government mandate statement[note] shall contain an estimate of the effect the law
will have on expenditures or revenues of local government for the first full fiscal
year the law is to be in effect.
(2) The director, at his or her discretion, may seek a certification from the Attorney
General on the question of whether a bill or order constitutes a state mandate. The
Attorney General shall, within seven (7) working days from receipt of the request,
certify to the director that the bill or order is or is not a state mandate.
(3) If any bill or order is amended after the preparation of the local government
mandate statement[fiscal note], it shall be resubmitted to the person responsible for
preparation of the local government mandate statement[note] who shall reevaluate
the bill or order as amended and change the local government mandate
statement[fiscal note] in accordance therewith.
(4) Copies of the local government mandate statement[fiscal note] shall be furnished
by the Legislative Research Commission to any local official upon written request.
Section 6. KRS 6.970 is amended to read as follows:
The Legislative Research Commission shall be responsible for compiling, analyzing, and
collecting fiscal and other information from local governments necessary for the
preparation of local government mandate statements[fiscal notes]. An information
system shall be developed and designed to provide sufficient continuing information on
the financial condition of local government which can be readily utilized for the
Page 4 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1080
preparation of local government mandate statements[fiscal notes]. In the development of
this information system, the Legislative Research Commission shall:
(1) Compile, analyze, and maintain in a unified, concise, and orderly form, information
on the nature and impact of existing state mandates and state programs which
involve the distribution of funds to local government; and
(2) Continuously compile, analyze, and maintain fiscal and other relevant information
which is required by statute or regulation to be prepared by local governments.
Section 7. KRS 13A.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An emergency administrative regulation is an administrative regulation that:
(a) An administrative body can clearly demonstrate, through documentary
evidence submitted with the filing of the emergency administrative regulation,
must be placed into effect immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, welfare, or the
environment;
2. Prevent an imminent loss of federal or state funds;
3. Meet an imminent deadline for the promulgation of an administrative
regulation that is established by state statute or federal law; or
4. Comply with an executive order issued under KRS Chapter 39A; and
(b) 1. Is temporary in nature and will expire as provided in this section; or
2. Is temporary in nature and will be replaced by an ordinary
administrative regulation as provided in this section.
For the purposes of this section, "imminent" means within two hundred seventy
(270) days of the filing of the emergency administrative regulation.
(2) An agency's finding of an emergency pursuant to this section shall not be based on
the agency's failure to timely process and file administrative regulations through the
ordinary administrative regulation process.
(3) An emergency administrative regulation:
Page 5 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1080
(a) Shall become effective and shall be considered as adopted upon filing;
(b) Shall be published in the Administrative Register in accordance with the
publication deadline established in KRS 13A.050(3);
(c) Shall be subject to the public comment provisions established in KRS
13A.270 and 13A.280;
(d) 1. May be reviewed at a subsequent meeting of a legislative committee
after the filing of the emergency administrative regulation; and
2. May, by a vote of the majority of the legislative committee's
membership as established by KRS 13A.020(4) and 13A.290(9), be
found to be deficient, and the deficiency shall be reported to the
Governor pursuant to KRS 13A.330(2); and
(e) May be amended:
1. By the promulgating administrative body after receiving public
comments as established in KRS 13A.280. The amended after
comments version shall:
a. Become effective upon filing; and
b. Not require a statement of emergency; or
2. At a legislative committee meeting as established in KRS 13A.320. The
amendment shall be approved as established by KRS 13A.020(4) and
KRS 13A.290(9). The amended version shall become effective upon
adjournment of the meeting following the procedures established in
KRS 13A.331.
(4) (a) Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, emergency
administrative regulations shall expire two hundred seventy (270) days after
the date of filing or when the same matter filed as an ordinary administrative
regulation filed for review is adopted, whichever occurs first.
(b) If an administrative body extends the time for filing a statement of
Page 6 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1080
consideration for an ordinary administrative regulation as provided by KRS
13A.280(2)(b), an emergency administrative regulation shall remain in effect
for two hundred seventy (270) days after the date of filing plus the number of
days extended under the provisions of KRS 13A.280(2)(b) or when the same
matter filed as an ordinary administrative regulation filed for review is
adopted, whichever occurs first.
(c) Filing an emergency amended after comments administrative regulation shall
not affect the expiration of an emergency regulation as established in
paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(5) Except as established in subsection (6) of this section, an emergency administrative
regulation with the same number or title or governing the same subject matter shall
not be filed for a period of two hundred seventy (270) days after it has been initially
filed.
(6) If an emergency administrative regulation with the same number or title or
governing the same subject matter as an emergency administrative regulation filed
within the previous two hundred seventy (270) days is filed, it shall contain a
detailed explanation of the manner in which it differs from the previously filed
emergency administrative regulation. The detailed explanation shall be included in
the statement of emergency required by subsection (7) of this section.
(7) Each emergency administrative regulation shall contain a statement of:
(a) The nature of the emergency;
(b) The reasons why an ordinary administrative regulation is not sufficient;
(c) Whether or not the emergency administrative regulation will be replaced by
an ordinary administrative regulation;
(d) If the emergency administrative regulation will be replaced by an ordinary
administrative regulation, the following statement: "The ordinary
administrative regulation (is or is not) identical to this emergency
Page 7 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1080
administrative regulation.";
(e) If the emergency administrative regulation will not be replaced by an ordinary
administrative regulation, the reasons therefor; and
(f) If applicable, the explanation required by subsection (6) of this section.
(8) (a) An administrative body shall attach the:
1. Statement of emergency required by subsection (7) of this section to the
front of the original and each copy of a proposed emergency
administrative regulation;
2. Public hearing and public comment period information required by KRS
13A.270(2), regulatory impact analysis, tiering statement, federal
mandate comparison, fiscal note on state or local government, summary
of material incorporated by reference if applicable, and other forms or
documents required by the provisions of this chapter to the back of the
emergency administrative regulation; and
3. Documentary evidence submitted justifying the finding of an emergency
in accordance with subsection (1) of this section to the back of the
emergency regulation if it is:
a. No more than four (4) pages in length; and
b. Typewritten on white paper, size eight and one-half (8-1/2) by
eleven (11) inches, and single-sided.
Larger volumes of documentary evidence shall be filed in a separate
binder or on a CD-ROM or DVD disc.
(b) An administrative body shall file with the regulations compiler:
1. The original and five (5) copies of the emergency administrative
regulation; and
2. At the same time as, or prior to, filing the paper version, an electronic
version of the emergency administrative regulation and the attachments
Page 8 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1080
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection saved as a single document
for each emergency administrative regulation in an electronic format
approved by the regulations compiler.
(c) The original and four (4) copies of each emergency administrative
regulation shall be stapled in the top left corner. The fifth copy of each
emergency administrative regulation shall not be stapled. The original
and the five (5) copies of each emergency administrative regulation shall
be grouped together.
(9) The statement of emergency shall have a two (2) inch top margin. The number of
the emergency administrative regulation shall be typed directly below the heading
"Statement of Emergency." The number of the emergency administrative regulation
shall be the same number as the ordinary administrative regulation followed by an
"E."
(10) Each executive department emergency administrative regulation shall be signed by
the head of the administrative body and countersigned by the Governor prior to
filing with the Commission. These signatures shall be on the statement of
emergency attached to the front of the emergency administrative regulation.
(11) If an emergency administrative regulation will be replaced by an ordinary
administrative regulation, the ordinary administrative regulation shall be filed at the
same time as the emergency administrative regulation that it will replace.
(12) If an ordinary administrative regulation that was filed to replace an emergency
administrative regulation is withdrawn:
(a) The emergency administrative regulation shall expire on the date the ordinary
administrative regulation is withdrawn; and
(b) The administrative body shall inform the regulations compiler of the reasons
for withdrawal in writing.
(13) (a) If an emergency administrative regulation that was intended to be replaced by
Page 9 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1080
an ordinary administrative regulation is withdrawn, the emergency
administrative regulation shall expire on the date it is withdrawn.
(b) If an emergency administrative regulation has been withdrawn, the ordinary
administrative regulation that was filed with it shall not expire unless the
administrative body informs the regulations compiler that the ordinary
administrative regulation is also withdrawn.
(c) If an emergency administrative regulation is withdrawn, the administrative
body shall inform the regulations compiler of the reasons for withdrawal in
writing.
(14) The administrative regulations compiler shall notify all legislative committees of
the number, title, and subject matter of all emergency administrative regulations
and shall forward any additional information filed about the emergency
administrative regulation requested by a legislative committee.
Section 8. KRS 13A.230 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The administrative body shall attach the following forms to the back of the original
and each copy of an administrative regulation:
(a) Regulatory impact analysis as required by KRS 13A.240;
(b) Tiering statement as required by KRS 13A.210;
(c) Fiscal note on state or local government as required by KRS 13A.250;
(d) Federal mandate comparison, if applicable, as required by KRS 13A.245; and
(e) The summaries provided for in KRS 13A.2245, 13A.2251, or 13A.2255, if
applicable.
(2) The forms required by subsection (1) of this section shall be obtained from the
regulations compiler.
(3) The electronic version of an administrative regulation and the attachments required
by subsection (1) of this section shall be sent by e-mail to the regulations compiler
in a single document at the same time as, or prior to, filing the paper version in
Page 10 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1080
accordance with KRS 13A.190, 13A.220, or 13A.280 in an electronic format
approved by the regulations compiler.
Section 9. KRS 13A.250 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An administrative body that promulgates an administrative regulation shall consider
the cost that the administrative regulation may cause state or local government and
regulated entities to incur.
(2) (a) A two (2) part cost analysis shall be completed for each administrative
regulation.
(b) The first part of the cost analysis shall include the projected cost or cost
savings to the Commonwealth of Kentucky and each of its affected agencies,
and the projected cost or cost savings to affected local governments, including
cities, counties, fire departments, and school districts.
(c) The second part of the cost analysis shall include the projected cost or cost
savings to the regulated entities affected by the administrative regulation.
(d) Agencies or entities affected by the administrative regulation may submit
comments in accordance with KRS 13A.270(1) to the promulgating
administrative body or to a legislative committee reviewing the administrative
regulation.
(3) Each administrative body that promulgates an administrative regulation shall
prepare and submit with the administrative regulation a fiscal note on state or local
government. The fiscal note on state or local government shall state:
(a) The number of the administrative regulation;
(b) The name, e-mail address, and telephone number of the contact person of the
administrative body identified pursuant to KRS 13A.220(6)(d), and, if
applicable, the name, e-mail address, and telephone number of an alternate
person to be contacted with specific questions about the fiscal note on state or
local government;
Page 11 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1080
(c) Each unit, part, or division of state or local government the administrative
regulation will affect;
(d) In detail, the aspect or service of state or local government to which the
administrative regulation relates, including identification of the applicable
state or federal statute or regulation that mandates the aspect or service or
authorizes the action taken by the administrative regulation;
(e) The estimated effect of the administrative regulation on the expenditures and
revenues of a state or local government agency or regulated entity for the first
full year the administrative regulation will be in effect. The administrative
body shall provide a narrative to explain the fiscal impact of the
administrative regulation and the methodology and resources it used to
determine the fiscal impact; and
(f) The conclusion of the promulgating administrative body as to whether the
administrative regulation will have a major economic impact, as defined in
KRS 13A.010, to state and local government and regulated entities, and an
explanation of the methodology and resources used by the administrative
body to reach this conclusion.
(4) Any administrative body may request the advice and assistance of the Commission
in the preparation of the fiscal note on state or local government.
Section 10. KRS 13A.280 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Following the last day of the comment period, the administrative body shall give
consideration to all comments received at the public hearing and all written
comments received during the comment period, including:
(a) Any report filed by the Commission on Small Business Innovation and
Advocacy in accordance with KRS 11.202(1)(e) and 13A.270(4), or by a local
government in accordance with KRS 11.202(1)(e) and 13A.270(5); and
(b) Any comments regarding the administrative regulation's major economic
Page 12 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1080
impact, as defined in KRS 13A.010, as submitted by agencies, local
governments, or regulated entities.
(2) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the administrative
body shall file with the commission on or before 12 noon, eastern time, on the
fifteenth day of the calendar month following the end of the public comment
period the statement of consideration relating to the administrative regulation
and, if applicable, the amended after comments version.
(b) If the administrative body has received a significant number of public
comments:
1. It may extend the time for filing the statement of consideration for an
ordinary administrative regulation and, if applicable, the amended after
comments version by notifying the regulations compiler in writing on or
before 12 noon, eastern time, on the fifteenth day of the calendar month
following the end of the public comment period; and
2. The administrative body shall file the statement of consideration for an
ordinary administrative regulation and, if applicable, the amended after
comments version, with the Commission on or before 12 noon, eastern
time, no later than the fifteenth day of the second calendar month
following the end of the public comment period.
(3) (a) If the administrative regulation is amended as a result of the hearing or written
comments received, the administrative body shall forward the items specified
in this paragraph to the regulations compiler by 12 noon, eastern time, on the
applicable deadline specified in subsection (2) of this section:
1. The original and five (5) copies of the administrative regulation
indicating any amendments resulting from comments received at the
public hearing and during the comment period. The amendments shall
be indicated in:
Page 13 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1080
a. The original wording for an ordinary administrative regulation; or
b. The wording of an emergency administrative regulation as
amended, for an emergency administrative regulation that was
amended at a legislative committee meeting pursuant to KRS
13A.190(3);
2. The original and five (5) copies of the statement of consideration as
required by subsection (2) of this section, attached to the back of the
original and each copy of the administrative regulation; and
3. The regulatory impact analysis, tiering statement, federal mandate
comparison, or fiscal note on state and local government. These
documents shall reflect changes resulting from amendments made after
the public hearing.
(b) The original and four (4) copies of the amended after comments version, the
statement of consideration, and the attachments required by paragraph (a)3. of
this subsection shall be stapled in the top left corner. The fifth copy shall not
be stapled.
(c) At the same time as, or prior to, filing the paper version, the administrative
body shall file an electronic version of the amended after comments version,
the statement of consideration, and the required attachments saved as a single
document for each amended after comments administrative regulation in an
electronic format approved by the regulations compiler.
(4) (a) If the administrative regulation is not amended as a result of the public
hearing, or written comments received, the administrative body shall file the
original and five (5) copies of the statement of consideration with the
regulations compiler by 12 noon, eastern time, on the deadline established in
subsection (2) of this section. The original and four (4) copies of the statement
of consideration shall be stapled in the top left corner. The fifth copy of each
Page 14 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1080
statement of consideration shall not be stapled.
(b) If the statement of consideration covers multiple administrative regulations, as
authorized by subsection (6)(g)1. of this section, the administrative body shall
file with the regulations compiler:
1. The original and five (5) copies of the statement of consideration as
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
2. Two (2) additional unstapled copies of the statement of consideration for
each additional administrative regulation included in the group of
administrative regulations.
(c) At the same time as, or prior to, filing the paper version, the administrative
body shall file an electronic version of the statement of consideration saved as
a single document for each statement of consideration in an electronic format
approved by the regulations compiler.
(5) If comments are received either at the public hearing or during the public comment
period, the administrative regulation shall be deferred to the next regularly
scheduled meeting of the subcommittee following the month in which the statement
of consideration is due.
(6) The format for the statement of consideration shall be as follows:
(a) The statement shall be typewritten on white paper, size eight and one-half (8-
1/2) by eleven (11) inches. Copies of the statement may be mechanically
reproduced;
(b) The first page of the statement of consideration shall have a two (2) inch top
margin;
(c) The heading of the statement shall consist of the words "STATEMENT OF
CONSIDERATION RELATING TO" followed by the number of the
administrative regulation that was the subject of the public hearing and
comment period and the name of the promulgating administrative body. The
Page 15 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1080
heading shall be centered. This shall be followed by the words "Not Amended
After Comments," "Emergency Not Amended After Comments," "Amended
After Comments," or "Emergency Amended After Comments," whichever is
applicable;
(d) If a hearing has been held or written comments received, the heading is to be
followed by:
1. A statement setting out the date, time and place of the hearing, if the
hearing was held;
2. A list of those persons who attended the hearing or who submitted
comments and the organization, agency, or other entity represented, if
applicable; and
3. The name and title of the representative of the promulgating
administrative body;
(e) Following the general information, the promulgating administrative body
shall summarize the comments received at the public hearing and during the
comment period and the response of the promulgating administrative body.
Each subject commented upon shall be summarized in a separate numbered
paragraph. Each numbered paragraph shall contain two (2) subsections:
1. Subsection (a) shall be labeled "Comment," shall identify the name of
the person, and the organization represented if applicable, who made the
comment, and shall contain a summary of the comment; and
2. Subsection (b) shall be labeled "Response" and shall contain the
response to the comment by the promulgating administrative body;
(f) Following the summary and comments, the promulgating administrative body
shall:
1. Summarize the statement and the action taken by the administrative
body as a result of comments received at the public hearing and during
Page 16 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1080
the comment period; and
2. If amended after the comment period, list the changes made to the
administrative regulation in the format prescribed by KRS
13A.320(2)(c) and (d); and
(g) 1. If administrative regulations were considered as a group at a public
hearing, one (1) statement of consideration may include the group of
administrative regulations. If a comment relates to one (1) or more of
the administrative regulations in the group, the summary of the
comment and response shall specify each administrative regulation to
which it applies.
2. Emergency administrative regulations shall be in a separate statement of
consideration from ordinary administrative regulations.
(7) If the administrative regulation is amended pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section, the full text of the administrative regulation shall be published in the
Administrative Register. The changes made to the administrative regulation shall be
typed in bold and made in the format prescribed by KRS 13A.222(2). The
administrative regulation shall be reviewed by the Administrative Regulation
Review Subcommittee after the[such] publication.
(8) If requested, copies of the statement of consideration and, if applicable, the
amended after comments version of the administrative regulation shall be made
available by the promulgating administrative body to persons attending the hearing
or submitting comments or who specifically request a copy from the administrative
body.
Page 17 of 17
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:15 PM Jacketed